Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB616.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 314.121 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Governor shall appoint a Board of Nursing consisting of seventeen (17)
members:
(a) Three (3) members shall be registered nurses actively engaged in clinical
practice consisting of direct bedside patient care on a daily basis and
licensed to practice in the Commonwealth at the time of appointment and
throughout their terms.
1. One (1) member shall be[,] selected from a list of names submitted by
the Kentucky School Nurses Association.
2. Two (2) members shall be selected from a list of names submitted by
the Kentucky Hospital Association;
(b) Three (3) members shall be advanced practice registered nurses actively
engaged in clinical practice and licensed to practice in the Commonwealth at
the time of appointment and throughout their terms, two (2) of whom shall
be selected from a list of names submitted by the Kentucky Association of
Nurse Practitioners and Nurse Midwives, and one (1) of whom shall be a
certified nurse anesthetist selected from a list of names submitted by the
Kentucky Association of Nurse Anesthetists;
(c) Two (2) members shall be practical nurses actively engaged in clinical
practice and licensed to practice in the Commonwealth at the time of
appointment and throughout their terms, selected from a list of names
submitted by the Kentucky Association of Licensed Practical Nurses;
(d) One (1) member shall be a nurse service administrator actively engaged in
practice who is a registered nurse licensed to practice in the Commonwealth
at the time of appointment and throughout the member's term, selected from
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/10/2026 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2132
a list of names submitted by the Kentucky Organization of Nurse Leaders;
(e) Four (4) members shall be actively engaged in nursing education, each of
whom is a registered nurse licensed to practice in the Commonwealth at the
time of appointment and throughout their terms,[ three (3) of whom shall
be] selected from a list of names submitted by the Kentucky League for
Nursing[ and one (1) of whom shall be selected from a list of names submitted
by the Kentucky Nurses Association];
(f) Two (2) members shall be registered nurses experienced in long-term care at
the time of appointment and throughout their terms, one (1) of whom shall
be selected from a list of names submitted by LeadingAge Kentucky, and one
(1) of whom shall be selected from a list of names submitted by the Kentucky
Association of Health Care Facilities; and
(g) Two (2) members shall be citizens at large, who are not associated with or
financially interested in the practice or business regulated.
(2) Each appointment shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate and shall be for a
term of four (4) years expiring on June 30 of the fourth year, except in 2024, when
new appointments shall be made by the Governor after July 15, 2024. A board
member shall not serve for more than three (3) consecutive terms, and shall be
ineligible for reappointment until the passage of one (1) full four (4) year
appointment cycle.
(3) (a) By August 1, 2024, the Kentucky School Nurses Association shall submit to
the Governor two (2) names of qualified individuals for appointment as a
registered nurse (R.N.) who are actively engaged in clinical nursing practice,
from which the Governor shall make an appointment as necessary by October
1, 2024. Thereafter, by March 1 of the year in which the term of an R.N.
actively engaged in clinical practice expires:
1. For one (1) of the three (3) members, the Kentucky School Nurses
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/10/2026 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2132
Association shall submit to the Governor two (2) names of qualified
individuals for appointment as an R.N. who are actively engaged in
clinical nursing practice, from which the Governor shall make an
appointment as necessary by July 1; and
2. For two (2) of the three (3) members, the Kentucky Hospital
Association shall submit to the Governor for each appointment two (2)
names of qualified individuals for appointment as an R.N. who are
actively engaged in clinical nursing practice, from which the
Governor shall make an appointment as necessary by July 1.
(b) By March 1 of[1of] the year in which the term of an L.P.N. expires, the
Kentucky Licensed Practical Nurses Organization Incorporated shall submit
to the Governor two (2) names of qualified individuals for appointment as an
L.P.N. who are actively engaged in clinical nursing practice, from which the
Governor shall make an appointment as necessary by July 1.
(c) By March 1 of the year in which the nurse service administrator's term
expires, the Kentucky Organization of Nurse Leaders, an affiliate of the
Kentucky Hospital Association, shall submit to the Governor two (2) names
of qualified individuals for appointment as the nurse service administrator,
from which list the Governor shall make an appointment as necessary by July
1.
(d) By March 1 of the year in which the term of the R.N. recommended by
LeadingAge Kentucky expires, LeadingAge Kentucky shall submit to the
Governor two (2) names of qualified individuals for appointment as an R.N.
experienced in long-term care, from which the Governor shall make an
appointment as necessary by July 1.
(e) By March 1 of the year in which the term of the R.N. recommended by
Kentucky Association of Health Care Facilities expires, the Kentucky
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/10/2026 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2132
Association of Health Care Facilities shall submit to the Governor two (2)
names of qualified individuals for appointment as an R.N. experienced in
long-term care, from which the Governor shall make an appointment as
necessary by July 1.
(f) By March 1 of the year in which the practical nurse educator's term expires,
the Kentucky League for Nursing shall submit to the Governor two (2) names
of qualified individuals for the appointment as a licensed practical nurse
educator, from which the Governor shall make the appointment as necessary
by July 1.
(g) By August 1, 2024, the Kentucky League for Nursing shall submit to the
Governor two (2) names of qualified individuals for appointment as a
graduate degree nurse educator, from which the Governor shall make an
appointment as necessary by October 1, 2024. Thereafter, by March 1 of the
year in which the term of the graduate degree nurse educator expires, the
Kentucky League for Nursing shall submit to the Governor two (2) names of
qualified individuals for the appointment as a graduate degree nurse educator,
from which the Governor shall make an appointment as necessary by July 1.
(h)[ By March 1, 2025, and thereafter on March 1 of the year in which the term of
the undergraduate nurse educator expires, the Kentucky Nurses Association
shall submit to the Governor two (2) names of qualified individuals for the
appointment as an undergraduate nurse educator, from which the Governor
shall make the appointment as necessary by July 1.
(i)] By March 1, 2026, and thereafter on March 1 of the year in which the term of
an[the] undergraduate nurse educator expires, the Kentucky League for
Nursing shall submit to the Governor two (2) names of qualified individuals
for each appointment as an undergraduate nurse educator, from which the
Governor shall make the appointment as necessary by July 1.
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/10/2026 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2132
(i)[(j)] By March 1 of the year in which the certified registered nurse anesthetist
term expires, the Kentucky Association of Nurse Anesthetists shall submit to
the Governor two (2) names of qualified individuals who are actively engaged
in clinical nursing practice for the appointment, from which the Governor
shall make the appointment as necessary by July 1.
(j)[(k)] By August 1, 2024, the Kentucky Association of Nurse Practitioners and
Nurse-Midwives shall submit to the Governor the names of qualified
individuals for appointments of two (2) advanced practice registered nurses.
The appointed individuals shall be certified in different population foci and
shall be actively engaged in advanced nursing clinical practice. Two (2)
names of qualified individuals shall be submitted to the Governor for each
position. The Governor shall appoint one (1) advanced practice registered
nurse from the two (2) names submitted in one (1) population focus for an
initial term of four (4) years and shall also appoint one (1) advanced practice
registered nurse from the two (2) names submitted in another population focus
for an initial term of two (2) years. The Governor shall make each
appointment as necessary by October 1, 2024. Successive terms for each
advanced registered nurse practitioner shall be four (4) years. The two (2)
advanced practice registered nurses shall be certified in a different population
focus. Thereafter, on March 1 of the year in which the term of an advanced
practice registered nurse expires, the Kentucky Association of Nurse
Practitioners and Nurse-Midwives shall submit to the Governor the names of
two (2) qualified individuals, from which the Governor shall make the
appointment as necessary by July 1.
(k)[(l)] The Governor shall appoint two (2) members who shall be citizens at
large, who are not associated with or financially interested in the practice or
business regulated. The Governor shall make the appointments by July 1 of
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/10/2026 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2132
the year in which the citizen members' terms expire.
(4) Among the seventeen (17) members of the board, at all times, at least two (2)
members shall be appointed from each of the six (6) congressional districts of the
Commonwealth.
(5) Among the nurse board members appointed under subsection (1) of this section, no
less than three (3) and no more than six (6) nurse board members shall be nurse
educators. All other nurse members of the board shall be practicing nurses.
(6) A vacancy on the board shall be filled by the Governor as provided for under
subsection (1) of this section.
(7) The Governor may remove any member from the board for neglect of duty,
incompetence, or unprofessional or dishonorable conduct.
(8) Each R.N. member of the board shall be a citizen of the United States, a resident of
Kentucky, a graduate of an approved school of nursing, and a registered nurse in
this state. All shall have had at least five (5) years of experience in nursing, three
(3) of which shall immediately precede such appointment. Three (3) members shall
be engaged in clinical nursing practice; four (4) shall be engaged in nursing
education; three (3) shall be engaged in advanced practice registered nursing, one
(1) of whom shall be a certified registered nurse anesthetist; two (2) shall be
experienced in long-term care; and one (1) shall be in nursing administration.
(9) Each L.P.N. member of the board shall be a citizen of the United States, a resident
of Kentucky, a graduate of an approved school of practical nursing or its equivalent,
licensed as a licensed practical nurse in this state, have at least five (5) years of
experience in nursing, three (3) of which shall immediately precede this
appointment, and be currently engaged in nursing practice. Two (2) members shall
be engaged in clinical nurse practice.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/10/2026 5:45 PM Jacketed